Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5247.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "freedom of information act". (2) It is the public policy of this state that, subject to section 3(7) to (9), all persons , except those persons incarcerated in state or local correctional facilities, are entitled to full and complete information regarding the affairs of government and the official acts of those who represent them as public officials and public employees, consistent with this act. The people shall must be informed so that they may fully participate in the democratic process. Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Cybersecurity assessment" means an investigation undertaken by a person, governmental body, or other entity to identify vulnerabilities in cybersecurity plans. (b) "Cybersecurity incident" includes, but is not limited to, a computer network intrusion or attempted intrusion; a breach of primary computer network controls; unauthorized access to programs, data, or information contained in a computer system; or actions by a third party that materially affect component performance or, because of impact to component systems, prevent normal computer system activities. (c) "Cybersecurity plan" includes, but is not limited to, information about a person's information systems, network security, encryption, network mapping, access control, passwords, authentication practices, computer hardware or software, or response to cybersecurity incidents. (d) "Cybersecurity vulnerability" means a deficiency within computer hardware or software, or within a computer network or information system, that could be exploited by unauthorized parties for use against an individual computer user or a computer network or information system. (e) "Field name" means the label or identification of an element of a computer database that contains a specific item of information, and includes, but is not limited to, a subject heading such as a column header, data dictionary, or record layout. (f) "FOIA coordinator" means either of the following: (i) An individual who is a public body. (ii) An individual designated by a public body in accordance with under section 6 to accept and process requests for public records under this act. (g) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, firm, organization, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Person does not include an individual serving a sentence of imprisonment in a state or county correctional facility in this state or any other state, or in a federal correctional facility. (h) "Public body" means any of the following: (i) A state officer, employee, agency, department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, authority, or other body in the executive branch of the state government, but does not include the governor or lieutenant governor, the executive office of the governor or lieutenant governor, or employees thereof. (ii) An agency, board, commission, or council in the legislative branch of the state government. (iii) A county, city, township, village, intercounty, intercity, or regional governing body, council, school district, special district, or municipal corporation, or a board, department, commission, council, or agency thereof. (iv) Any other body that is created by state or local authority or is primarily funded by or through state or local authority, except that it does not include the judiciary , including or the office of the county clerk and its employees when acting in the capacity of clerk to the circuit court. , is not included in the definition of public body. (i) "Public record" means a writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by a public body in the performance of an official function, from the time it is created. Public record does not include computer software. This act separates public records into the following 2 classes: (i) Those that are exempt from disclosure under section 13. (ii) All public records that are not exempt from disclosure under section 13 and that are subject to disclosure under this act. (j) "Software" means a set of statements or instructions that when incorporated in a machine usable medium is capable of causing a machine or device having information processing capabilities to indicate, perform, or achieve a particular function, task, or result. Software does not include computer-stored information or data, or a field name if disclosure of that field name does not violate a software license. (k) "Unusual circumstances" means any 1 or a combination of the following, but only to the extent necessary for the proper processing of a request: (i) The need to search for, collect, or appropriately examine or review a voluminous amount of separate and distinct public records pursuant to a single request. (ii) The need to collect the requested public records from numerous field offices, facilities, or other establishments which that are located apart from the particular office receiving or processing the request. (l) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, photocopying, and every other means of recording, and includes letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combinations thereof, and papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films or prints, microfilm, microfiche, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, hard drives, solid state storage components, or other means of recording or retaining meaningful content. (m) "Written request" means a writing that asks for information, and includes a writing transmitted by facsimile, electronic mail, email, or other electronic means. Sec. 3. (1) Except as expressly provided in section 13, and subject to subsections (7) to (9), upon providing a public body's FOIA coordinator with a written request that describes a public record sufficiently to enable the public body to find the public record, a person has a right to inspect, copy, or receive copies of the requested public record of the public body. A request from a person, other than an individual who qualifies as indigent under section 4(2)(a), must include the requesting person's complete name, address, and contact information, and, if the request is made by a person other than an individual, the complete name, address, and contact information of the person's agent who is an individual. An address must be written in compliance with United States Postal Service addressing standards. Contact Except for an individual who makes a request under subsection (7), contact information must include a valid telephone number or electronic mail email address. A person has a right to subscribe to future issuances of public records that are created, issued, or disseminated on a regular basis. A subscription is valid for up to 6 months, at the request of the subscriber, and is renewable. An employee of a public body who receives a request for a public record shall promptly forward that request to the freedom of information act coordinator. (2) A freedom of information act coordinator shall keep a copy of all written requests for public records on file for no not less than 1 year. (3) A public body shall furnish a requesting person a reasonable opportunity for inspection and examination of its public records, and shall furnish reasonable facilities for making memoranda or abstracts from its public records during the usual business hours. A public body may make reasonable rules necessary to protect its public records and to prevent excessive and unreasonable interference with the discharge of its functions. A public body shall protect public records from loss, unauthorized alteration, mutilation, or destruction. (4) This act does not require a public body to make a compilation, summary, or report of information, except as required in section 11. (5) This act does not require a public body to create a new public record, except as required in section 11, and to the extent required by this act for the furnishing of copies, or edited copies pursuant to under section 14(1), of an already existing public record. (6) The custodian of a public record shall, upon written request, furnish a requesting person a certified copy of a public record. (7) The right to receive a copy of a public record under this act is available to an individual incarcerated in a county, state, or federal correctional facility in this state or any other state only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) In addition to complying with the requirements for a proper request for public records under this act, the request must indicate that it is made under this subsection. (b) The requested record must not be exempt under section 13. (c) The requested record must contain 1 or more specific references to the incarcerated individual or the individual's minor child for whom the individual has not been denied parenting time under the child custody act of 1970, 1970 PA 91, MCL 722.21 to 722.31, and the record must otherwise be accessible to the individual by law. (d) The requested record must be related to 1 or more of the following: (i) An arrest or prosecution of the incarcerated individual. (ii) An arrest, a prosecution, or a juvenile adjudication of the incarcerated individual's minor child as described in subdivision (c). (iii) An arrest, a prosecution, or a juvenile adjudication as to which the incarcerated individual is an alleged victim. (iv) An arrest, a prosecution, or a juvenile adjudication as to which the incarcerated individual's minor child, as described in subdivision (c), is an alleged victim. (e) If the asserted right to disclosure of a public record under this subsection is based on the record containing 1 or more specific references to the incarcerated individual's minor child, as described in subdivisions (c) and (d)(ii) or (iv), the request must be accompanied by an affidavit of the incarcerated individual attesting to both of the following: (i) That the individual identified as the incarcerated individual's minor child is in fact the incarcerated individual's minor child. (ii) That the incarcerated individual has in fact not been denied parenting time of that minor child under the child custody act of 1970, 1970 PA 91, MCL 722.21 to 722.31. (8) The right of incarcerated individuals described in subsection (7) is not intended to interfere with any properly adopted rules that the department of corrections may have regarding the content of mail that may be delivered to an individual incarcerated in a state correctional facility in this state. (9) If a public body that receives a request for a public record under subsection (7) does not possess any record related to an arrest or prosecution as described in subsection (7)(c) and (d), the public body shall deny the request in a response provided within 30 days after receiving the request certifying that the public body does not possess any record related to an arrest or prosecution as described in subsection (7)(c) and (d). A public body's denial made in accordance with this subsection is not subject to appeal under this act. Sec. 5. (1) Except as provided in section 3, a person desiring to inspect or receive a copy of a public record shall make a written request for the public record to the FOIA coordinator of a public body. A written request made by facsimile, electronic mail, email, or other electronic transmission is not received by a public body's FOIA coordinator until 1 business day after the electronic transmission is made. However, if a written request is sent by electronic mail email and delivered to the public body's spam or junk-mail folder, the request is not received until 1 day after the public body first becomes aware of the written request. The public body shall note in its records both the time a written request is delivered to its spam or junk-mail folder and the time the public body first becomes aware of that request. (2) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the person making the request, a public body shall, subject to subsection subsections (10) and (11) and section 3(9), respond to a request for a public record within 5 business days after the public body receives the request by doing 1 of the following: (a) Granting the request. (b) Issuing a written notice to the requesting person denying the request. (c) Granting the request in part and issuing a written notice to the requesting person denying the request in part. (d) Issuing a notice extending for not more than 10 business days the period during which the public body shall respond to the request. A public body shall not issue more than 1 notice of extension for a particular request. This subdivision does not apply to a response that is subject to subsection (11). (3) Failure to respond to a request under subsection (2) constitutes a public body's final determination to deny the request if either of the following applies: (a) The failure was willful and intentional. (b) The written request included language that conveyed a request for information within the first 250 words of the body of a letter, facsimile, electronic mail, email, or electronic mail email attachment, or specifically included the words, characters, or abbreviations for "freedom of information", "information", "FOIA", "copy", or a recognizable misspelling of such, or appropriate legal code reference to this act, on the front of an envelope or in the subject line of an electronic mail, email, letter, or facsimile cover page. (4) In a civil action to compel a public body's disclosure of a public record under section 10, the court shall assess damages against the public body under section 10(7) if the court has done both of the following: (a) Determined that the public body has not complied with subsection (2). (b) Ordered the public body to disclose or provide copies of all or a portion of the public record. (5) A written notice denying a request for a public record in whole or in part is a public body's final determination to deny the request or portion of that request. The written notice must contain: (a) An explanation of the basis under this act or other statute for the determination that the public record, or portion of that public record, is exempt from disclosure, if that is the reason for denying all or a portion of the request. (b) A certificate that the public record does not exist under the name given by the requester or by another name reasonably known to the public body, if that is the reason for denying the request or a portion of the request. (c) A description of a public record or information on a public record that is separated or deleted under section 14, if a separation or deletion is made. (d) A full explanation of the requesting person's right to do either of the following: (i) Submit to the head of the public body a written appeal that specifically states the word "appeal" and identifies the reason or reasons for reversal of the disclosure denial. (ii) Seek judicial review of the denial under section 10. (e) Notice of the right to receive attorneys' attorney fees and damages as provided in section 10 if, after judicial review, the court determines that the public body has not complied with this section and orders disclosure of all or a portion of a public record. (6) The individual designated in section 6 as responsible for the denial of the request shall sign the written notice of denial. (7) If a public body issues a notice extending the period for a response to the request, the notice must specify the reasons for the extension and the date by which the public body will do 1 of the following: (a) Grant the request. (b) Issue a written notice to the requesting person denying the request. (c) Grant the request in part and issue a written notice to the requesting person denying the request in part. (8) If a public body makes a final determination to deny in whole or in part a request to inspect or receive a copy of a public record or portion of that public record, the requesting person may do either of the following: (a) Appeal the denial to the head of the public body under section 10. (b) Commence a civil action, under section 10. (9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, a public body that maintains a law enforcement records management system and stores public records for another public body that subscribes to the law enforcement records management system is not in possession of, retaining, or the custodian of, a public record stored on behalf of the subscribing public body. If the public body that maintains a law enforcement records management system receives a written request for a public record that is stored on behalf of a subscribing public body, the public body that maintains the law enforcement records management system shall, within 10 business days after receipt of the request, give written notice to the requesting person identifying the subscribing public body and stating that the requesting person shall must submit the request to the subscribing public body. As used in this subsection, "law enforcement records management system" means a data storage system that may be used voluntarily by subscribers, including any subscribing public bodies, to share information and facilitate intergovernmental collaboration in the provision of law enforcement services. (10) A person making a request under subsection (1) may stipulate that the public body's response under subsection (2) be electronically mailed, emailed, delivered by facsimile, or delivered by first-class mail. This subsection does not apply if the public body lacks the technological capability to provide an electronically mailed emailed response. (11) If the department of corrections or a local law enforcement agency receives a request submitted under section 3(7) by an individual incarcerated in a state correctional facility in this state or a local correctional facility in this state, the department of corrections or local law enforcement agency shall respond to the request in the manner prescribed in subsection (2)(a) to (c) within 30 days after the department of corrections or local law enforcement agency receives the request. This subsection does not apply to a request that is properly denied under section 3(9).